Nevada, session 83, AB439-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any policy of
health insurance delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this
State is binding upon any person insured under the policy who
makes a claim.
2. If a policy of health insurance contains a provision for
arbitration, the policy of health insurance must include a
statement that the arbitration provision is not binding upon any
person insured under the policy of health insurance who makes a
claim.
Sec. 5. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 4 of this act.
Sec. 6. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any policy of
group or blanket health insurance delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed in this State is binding upon any person insured under
the policy who makes a claim.
2. If a policy of group or blanket health insurance contains a
provision for arbitration, the policy of group or blanket health
insurance must include a statement that the arbitration provision
is not binding upon any person insured under the policy of group
or blanket health insurance who makes a claim.
Sec. 7. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any health
benefit plan delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this State
-
*AB439_R2*

– 3 –
is binding upon any person insured under the health benefit plan
who makes a claim.
2. If a health benefit plan contains a provision for
arbitration, the health benefit plan must include a statement that
the arbitration provision is not binding upon any person insured
under the health benefit plan who makes a claim.
Sec. 8. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 7 of this act, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any benefit
contract delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this State is
binding upon any person insured under the contract who makes a
claim.
2. If a benefit contract contains a provision for arbitration,
the benefit contract must include a statement that the arbitration
provision is not binding upon any person insured under the
benefit contract who makes a claim.
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16.5. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any contract for
hospital, medical or dental services delivered, issued for delivery
or renewed in this State is binding upon any person insured under
the contract for hospital, medical or dental services.
2. If a contract for hospital, medical or dental services
contains a provision for arbitration, the contract must include a
statement that the arbitration provision is not binding upon any
person insured under the contract for hospital, medical or dental
services.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to a contract
between:
-
*AB439_R2*

– 4 –
(a) A plan sponsor, as defined in section 3(16)(B) of the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. §
1002(16)(B), as that section existed on July 16, 1997; and
(b) A hospital or a provider of health care, as defined in
NRS 439.820.
Sec. 17. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any evidence of
coverage delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this State is
binding upon any person insured under the evidence of coverage
who makes a claim.
2. If an evidence of coverage contains a provision for
arbitration, the evidence of coverage must include a statement that
the arbitration provision is not binding upon any person insured
under the evidence of coverage who makes a claim.
Sec. 18. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759 [,] and 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, [and 695C.265] do not apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.1694 to 695C.1698, inclusive,
695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731, 695C.17333,
-
*AB439_R2*

– 5 –
695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743,
695C.1745 and 695C.1757 apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid.
Sec. 18.5. Chapter 695D of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any plan for
dental care delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this State is
binding upon any person insured under the plan for dental care
who makes a claim.
2. If a plan for dental care contains a provision for
arbitration, the plan for dental care must include a statement that
the arbitration provision is not binding upon any person insured
under the plan for dental care who makes a claim.
Sec. 19. Chapter 695F of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any evidence of
coverage delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this State is
binding upon any person insured under the evidence of coverage
who makes a claim.
2. If an evidence of coverage contains a provision for
arbitration, the evidence of coverage must include a statement that
the arbitration provision is not binding upon any person insured
under the evidence of coverage who makes a claim.
Sec. 20. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No provision for arbitration contained in any evidence of
coverage delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this State is
binding upon any person insured under the evidence of coverage
who makes a claim.
2. If an evidence of coverage contains a provision for
arbitration, the evidence of coverage must include a statement that
the arbitration provision is not binding upon any person insured
under the evidence of coverage who makes a claim.
Sec. 21. The provisions of this act do not apply to any contract
for insurance existing on October 1, 2023, but apply to any renewal
of such a contract.
Sec. 22. NRS 689A.0403, 689B.067, 689B.270, 695B.181,
695B.182, 695C.265 and 695C.267 are hereby repealed.
-
*AB439_R2*

– 6 –
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
689A.0403 Procedure for arbitration of disputes
concerning independent medical, dental or chiropractic
evaluations.
689B.067 Provision in policy requiring binding arbitration
for disputes with insurer authorized; procedure for arbitration;
declaratory relief.
689B.270 Required procedure for arbitration of disputes
concerning independent medical, dental or chiropractic
evaluations.
695B.181 Provision in contract requiring binding
arbitration authorized; procedures for arbitration; declaratory
relief.
695B.182 Required procedure for arbitration of disputes
concerning independent medical, dental or chiropractic
evaluations.
695C.265 Required procedure for arbitration of disputes
concerning independent medical, dental or chiropractic
evaluations.
695C.267 Provision requiring binding arbitration
authorized; procedures for arbitration; declaratory relief.
H
-
*AB439_R2*